test/data/inspect/capitalize.regex
#context condition
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
# initial letter uppercase
[
[a -> [A "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 b -> [B "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 c -> [C "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 d -> [D "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 e -> [E "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 f -> [F "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 g -> [G "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 h -> [H "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 i -> [I "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 ï -> [Ï "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 j -> [J "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 k -> [K "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 l -> [L "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 m -> [M "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 n -> [N "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 o -> [O "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 p -> [P "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 q -> [Q "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 r -> [R "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 s -> [S "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 t -> [T "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 u -> [U "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 v -> [V "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 w -> [W "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 x -> [X "<CORR>"]::5 , 
 y -> [Y "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 z -> [Z "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 æ -> [Æ "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 ö -> [Ö "<CORR>"]::5 ,
 å -> [Å "<CORR>"]::5 || .#.  _ ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ];
